Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1578.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Optional standard deduction; taxable year 2025 Notwithstanding section 43-1041, Arizona Revised Statutes, for the taxable year beginning from and after December 31, 2024 through December 31, 2025, a taxpayer may elect to take a standard deduction as follows: 1. In the case of a single person or a married person filing separately, the standard deduction is $15,750. 2. In the case of a single person who is a head of a household, the standard deduction is $23,625. 3. In the case of a married couple filing a joint return, the standard deduction is $31,500.